District of Columbia statutes.
8-1907

Annual dangerous dog licensing drive; educational program.

(a)

The Mayor shall conduct an annual dangerous dog licensing drive in order to ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Within 180 days of October 18, 1988, the Mayor shall implement an educational campaign for the public on provisions of this chapter and existing laws concerning animal control.

Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176, § 8, 35 DCR 4787
1981 Ed., § 6-1021.7.